Maryland, session 2025, HB0886.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Personnel and Pensions
23–215.3.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(1) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2011, WAS A MEMBER OF THE
EMPLOYEES’ PENSION SYSTEM WHO WAS SUBJECT TO:
(I) THE NONCONTRIBUTORY PENSION BENEFIT UNDER PART I
OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(II) THE CONTRIBUTORY PENSION BENEFIT UNDER PART II OF
THIS SUBTITLE;
(2) (I) IS SEPARATED FROM EMPLOYMENT FOR 4 YEARS OR LESS;
– 1 –

Ch. 770 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) 1. IS SEPARATED FROM EMPLOYMENT FOR MILITARY
SERVICE THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE FEDERAL UNIFORMED
SERVICES EMPLOYMENT AND REEMPLOYMENT RIGHTS ACT; AND
2. RESUMES EMPLOYMENT WITHIN 1 YEAR OF LEAVING
MILITARY SERVICE IN A POSITION THAT:
A. FOR AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (1)(I)
OF THIS SUBSECTION IS SUBJECT TO THE NONCONTRIBUTORY PENSION BENEFIT
UNDER PART I OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
B. FOR AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED UNDER ITEM (1)(II)
OF THIS SUBSECTION IS SUBJECT TO THE CONTRIBUTORY PENSION BENEFIT UNDER
PART II OF THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(III) IS SEPARATED FROM EMPLOYMENT WITH THE MINIMUM
ELIGIBILITY SERVICE NEEDED TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR A VESTED ALLOWANCE UNDER
TITLE 29, SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(3) DOES NOT WITHDRAW THE MEMBER’S ACCUMULATED
CONTRIBUTIONS; AND
(4) DOES NOT BECOME A RETIREE.
(B) (1) AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A)(1)(I) OF THIS
SECTION WHO RESUMES EMPLOYMENT IN A POSITION THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE
NONCONTRIBUTORY PENSION BENEFIT OF PART I OF THIS SUBTITLE IS SUBJECT TO
THE SAME REQUIREMENTS TO WHICH AN INDIVIDUAL WHO WAS SUBJECT TO THE
NONCONTRIBUTORY PENSION BENEFIT OF PART I OF THIS SUBTITLE ON JUNE 30,
2011, AND REMAINS A MEMBER ON JULY 1, 2011, IS SUBJECT.
(2) AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A)(1)(II) OF THIS
SECTION WHO RESUMES EMPLOYMENT IN A POSITION THAT IS SUBJECT TO THE
CONTRIBUTORY PENSION BENEFIT OF PART II OF THIS SUBTITLE IS SUBJECT TO
THE SAME REQUIREMENTS TO WHICH AN INDIVIDUAL WHO WAS SUBJECT TO THE
CONTRIBUTORY PENSION BENEFIT OF PART II OF THIS SUBTITLE ON JUNE 30, 2011,
AND REMAINS A MEMBER ON JULY 1, 2011, IS SUBJECT.
24–207.1.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 770
(1) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2011, WAS A MEMBER OF THE STATE
POLICE RETIREMENT SYSTEM;
(2) (I) IS SEPARATED FROM EMPLOYMENT FOR 4 YEARS OR LESS;
(II) 1. IS SEPARATED FROM EMPLOYMENT FOR MILITARY
SERVICE THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE FEDERAL UNIFORMED
SERVICES EMPLOYMENT AND REEMPLOYMENT RIGHTS ACT; AND
2. RESUMES EMPLOYMENT WITHIN 1 YEAR OF LEAVING
MILITARY SERVICE IN A POSITION THAT IS INCLUDED IN THE STATE POLICE
RETIREMENT SYSTEM; OR
(III) IS SEPARATED FROM EMPLOYMENT WITH THE MINIMUM
ELIGIBILITY SERVICE NEEDED TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR A VESTED ALLOWANCE UNDER
TITLE 29, SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(3) DOES NOT WITHDRAW THE MEMBER’S ACCUMULATED
CONTRIBUTIONS; AND
(4) DOES NOT BECOME A RETIREE.
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION WHO
RESUMES EMPLOYMENT IN A POSITION THAT IS INCLUDED IN THE STATE POLICE
RETIREMENT SYSTEM IS SUBJECT TO THE SAME REQUIREMENTS TO WHICH AN
INDIVIDUAL WHO WAS A MEMBER OF THE STATE POLICE RETIREMENT SYSTEM ON
JUNE 30, 2011, AND REMAINS A MEMBER ON JULY 1, 2011, IS SUBJECT.
25–205.1.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(1) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2011, WAS A MEMBER OF THE
CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM;
(2) (I) IS SEPARATED FROM EMPLOYMENT FOR 4 YEARS OR LESS;
(II) 1. IS SEPARATED FROM EMPLOYMENT FOR MILITARY
SERVICE THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE FEDERAL UNIFORMED
SERVICES EMPLOYMENT AND REEMPLOYMENT RIGHTS ACT; AND
2. RESUMES EMPLOYMENT WITHIN 1 YEAR OF LEAVING
MILITARY SERVICE IN A POSITION THAT IS INCLUDED IN THE CORRECTIONAL
OFFICERS’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM; OR
– 3 –

Ch. 770 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(III) IS SEPARATED FROM EMPLOYMENT WITH THE MINIMUM
ELIGIBILITY SERVICE NEEDED TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR A VESTED ALLOWANCE UNDER
TITLE 29, SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(3) DOES NOT WITHDRAW THE MEMBER’S ACCUMULATED
CONTRIBUTIONS; AND
(4) DOES NOT BECOME A RETIREE.
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION WHO
RESUMES EMPLOYMENT IN A POSITION THAT IS INCLUDED IN THE CORRECTIONAL
OFFICERS’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM IS SUBJECT TO THE SAME REQUIREMENTS TO
WHICH AN INDIVIDUAL WHO WAS A MEMBER OF THE CORRECTIONAL OFFICERS’
RETIREMENT SYSTEM ON JUNE 30, 2011, AND REMAINS A MEMBER ON JULY 1, 2011,
IS SUBJECT.
26–206.1.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO:
(1) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30, 2011, WAS A MEMBER OF THE LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS’ PENSION SYSTEM;
(2) (I) IS SEPARATED FROM EMPLOYMENT FOR 4 YEARS OR LESS;
(II) 1. IS SEPARATED FROM EMPLOYMENT FOR MILITARY
SERVICE THAT MEETS THE REQUIREMENTS OF THE FEDERAL UNIFORMED
SERVICES EMPLOYMENT AND REEMPLOYMENT RIGHTS ACT; AND
2. RESUMES EMPLOYMENT WITHIN 1 YEAR OF LEAVING
MILITARY SERVICE IN A POSITION THAT IS INCLUDED IN THE CORRECTIONAL
OFFICERS’ RETIREMENT SYSTEM; OR
(III) IS SEPARATED FROM EMPLOYMENT WITH THE MINIMUM
ELIGIBILITY SERVICE NEEDED TO BE ELIGIBLE FOR A VESTED ALLOWANCE UNDER
TITLE 29, SUBTITLE 3 OF THIS ARTICLE;
(3) DOES NOT WITHDRAW THE MEMBER’S ACCUMULATED
CONTRIBUTIONS; AND
(4) DOES NOT BECOME A RETIREE.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 770
(B) AN INDIVIDUAL DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION WHO
RESUMES EMPLOYMENT IN A POSITION THAT IS INCLUDED IN THE LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS’ PENSION SYSTEM IS SUBJECT TO THE SAME
REQUIREMENTS TO WHICH AN INDIVIDUAL WHO WAS A MEMBER OF THE LAW
ENFORCEMENT OFFICERS’ PENSION SYSTEM ON JUNE 30, 2011, AND REMAINS A
MEMBER ON JULY 1, 2011, IS SUBJECT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 5 –